Washington statutes.
RCW 36.48.010

Depositaries to be designated by treasurer.

Each county treasurer shall annually at the end of each fiscal year or at such other times as may be deemed necessary, designate one or more financial institutions in the state which are qualified public depositaries as set forth by the public deposit protection commission as depositary or depositaries for all public funds held and required to be kept by the treasurer, and no county treasurer shall deposit any public money in financial institutions, except as herein provided. Public funds of the county or a special district for which the county treasurer acts as its treasurer may only be deposited in bank accounts authorized by the treasurer or authorized in statute. All bank card depository service contracts for the county and special districts for which the county treasurer acts as its treasurer must be authorized by the county treasurer.

[ 1998 c 106 s 6; 1984 c 177 s 8; 1973 c 126 s 5; 1969 ex.s. c 193 s 27; 1963 c 4 s 36.48.010. Prior: 1907 c 51 s 1; RRS s 5562.]

NOTES:

Construction—Severability—1969 ex.s. c 193: See notes following RCW 39.58.010.

Public depositaries: Chapter 39.58 RCW.